Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.110

Warrants—Interest rate—Payment.

Code city warrants shall draw interest, be paid, and called for all as provided in RCW 35.21.320 and the duty and liability of the treasurer of a code city in calling and paying warrants of the city shall be as provided in RCW 35.21.320.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.110.]